Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.001

Scope of definitions.

Words and phrases as defined in this chapter, wherever used in Title 29A RCW, shall have the meaning as in this chapter ascribed to them, unless where used the context thereof shall clearly indicate to the contrary or unless otherwise defined in the chapter of which they are a part.

[ 2003 c 111 s 101. Prior: 1965 c 9 s 29.01.005. For like prior law see 1907 c 209 s 1, part; RRS s 5177, part. Formerly RCW 29.01.005.]